Tables/Contraction/ko.ctb
always 먿 15-234-35
always 멀 15-234-2
always 멁 15-234-2-1
always 멂 15-234-2-26
always 멃 15-234-2-12
always 멄 15-234-2-3
always 멅 15-234-2-236
always 멆 15-234-2-256
always 멇 15-234-2-356
always 멈 15-234-26
always 멉 15-234-12
always 멊 15-234-12-3
always 멋 15-234-3
always 멌 15-234-3-3
always 멍 15-234-2356
always 멎 15-234-13
always 멏 15-234-23
always 멐 15-234-235
always 멑 15-234-236
always 멒 15-234-256
always 멓 15-234-356
always 메 15-1345
always 멕 15-1345-1
always 멖 15-1345-1-1
always 멗 15-1345-1-3
always 멘 15-1345-25
always 멙 15-1345-25-13
always 멚 15-1345-25-356
always 멛 15-1345-35
always 멜 15-1345-2
always 멝 15-1345-2-1
always 멞 15-1345-2-26
always 멟 15-1345-2-12
always 멠 15-1345-2-3
always 멡 15-1345-2-236
always 멢 15-1345-2-256
always 멣 15-1345-2-356
always 멤 15-1345-26
always 멥 15-1345-12
always 멦 15-1345-12-3
always 멧 15-1345-3
always 멨 15-1345-3-3
always 멩 15-1345-2356
always 멪 15-1345-13
always 멫 15-1345-23
always 멬 15-1345-235
always 멭 15-1345-236
always 멮 15-1345-256
always 멯 15-1345-356
always 며 15-156
always 멱 15-156-1
always 멲 15-156-1-1
always 멳 15-156-1-3
always 면 15-156-25
always 멵 15-156-25-13
always 멶 15-156-25-356
always 멷 15-156-35
always 멸 15-156-2
always 멹 15-156-2-1
always 멺 15-156-2-26
always 멻 15-156-2-12
always 멼 15-156-2-3
always 멽 15-156-2-236
always 멾 15-156-2-256
always 멿 15-156-2-356
always 몀 15-156-26
always 몁 15-156-12
always 몂 15-156-12-3
always 몃 15-156-3
always 몄 15-156-3-3
always 명 15-156-2356
always 몆 15-156-13
always 몇 15-156-23
always 몈 15-156-235
always 몉 15-156-236
always 몊 15-156-256
always 몋 15-156-356
always 몌 15-34
always 몍 15-34-1
always 몎 15-34-1-1
always 몏 15-34-1-3
always 몐 15-34-25
always 몑 15-34-25-13
always 몒 15-34-25-356
always 몓 15-34-35
always 몔 15-34-2
always 몕 15-34-2-1
always 몖 15-34-2-26
always 몗 15-34-2-12
always 몘 15-34-2-3
always 몙 15-34-2-236
always 몚 15-34-2-256
always 몛 15-34-2-356
always 몜 15-34-26
always 몝 15-34-12
always 몞 15-34-12-3
always 몟 15-34-3
always 몠 15-34-3-3
always 몡 15-34-2356
always 몢 15-34-13
always 몣 15-34-23
always 몤 15-34-235
always 몥 15-34-236
always 몦 15-34-256
always 몧 15-34-356
always 모 15-136
always 목 15-136-1
always 몪 15-136-1-1
always 몫 15-136-1-3
always 몬 15-136-25
always 몭 15-136-25-13
always 몮 15-136-25-356
always 몯 15-136-35
always 몰 15-136-2
always 몱 15-136-2-1
always 몲 15-136-2-26
always 몳 15-136-2-12
always 몴 15-136-2-3
always 몵 15-136-2-236
always 몶 15-136-2-256
always 몷 15-136-2-356
always 몸 15-136-26
always 몹 15-136-12
always 몺 15-136-12-3
always 못 15-136-3
always 몼 15-136-3-3
always 몽 15-136-2356
always 몾 15-136-13
always 몿 15-136-23
always 뫀 15-136-235
always 뫁 15-136-236
always 뫂 15-136-256
always 뫃 15-136-356
always 뫄 15-1236
always 뫅 15-1236-1
always 뫆 15-1236-1-1
always 뫇 15-1236-1-3
always 뫈 15-1236-25
always 뫉 15-1236-25-13
always 뫊 15-1236-25-356
always 뫋 15-1236-35
always 뫌 15-1236-2
always 뫍 15-1236-2-1
always 뫎 15-1236-2-26
always 뫏 15-1236-2-12
always 뫐 15-1236-2-3
always 뫑 15-1236-2-236
always 뫒 15-1236-2-256
always 뫓 15-1236-2-356
always 뫔 15-1236-26
always 뫕 15-1236-12
always 뫖 15-1236-12-3
always 뫗 15-1236-3
always 뫘 15-1236-3-3
always 뫙 15-1236-2356
always 뫚 15-1236-13
always 뫛 15-1236-23
always 뫜 15-1236-235
always 뫝 15-1236-236
always 뫞 15-1236-256
always 뫟 15-1236-356
always 뫠 15-1236-1235
always 뫡 15-1236-1235-1
always 뫢 15-1236-1235-1-1
always 뫣 15-1236-1235-1-3
always 뫤 15-1236-1235-25
always 뫥 15-1236-1235-25-13
always 뫦 15-1236-1235-25-356
always 뫧 15-1236-1235-35
always 뫨 15-1236-1235-2
always 뫩 15-1236-1235-2-1
always 뫪 15-1236-1235-2-26
always 뫫 15-1236-1235-2-12
always 뫬 15-1236-1235-2-3
always 뫭 15-1236-1235-2-236
always 뫮 15-1236-1235-2-256
always 뫯 15-1236-1235-2-356
always 뫰 15-1236-1235-26
always 뫱 15-1236-1235-12
always 뫲 15-1236-1235-12-3
always 뫳 15-1236-1235-3
always 뫴 15-1236-1235-3-3
always 뫵 15-1236-1235-2356
always 뫶 15-1236-1235-13
always 뫷 15-1236-1235-23
always 뫸 15-1236-1235-235
always 뫹 15-1236-1235-236
always 뫺 15-1236-1235-256
always 뫻 15-1236-1235-356
always 뫼 15-13456
always 뫽 15-13456-1
always 뫾 15-13456-1-1
always 뫿 15-13456-1-3
always 묀 15-13456-25
always 묁 15-13456-25-13
always 묂 15-13456-25-356
always 묃 15-13456-35
always 묄 15-13456-2
always 묅 15-13456-2-1
always 묆 15-13456-2-26
always 묇 15-13456-2-12
always 묈 15-13456-2-3
always 묉 15-13456-2-236
always 묊 15-13456-2-256
always 묋 15-13456-2-356
always 묌 15-13456-26
always 묍 15-13456-12
always 묎 15-13456-12-3
always 묏 15-13456-3
always 묐 15-13456-3-3
always 묑 15-13456-2356
always 묒 15-13456-13
always 묓 15-13456-23
always 묔 15-13456-235
always 묕 15-13456-236
always 묖 15-13456-256
always 묗 15-13456-356
always 묘 15-346
always 묙 15-346-1
always 묚 15-346-1-1
always 묛 15-346-1-3
always 묜 15-346-25
always 묝 15-346-25-13
always 묞 15-346-25-356
always 묟 15-346-35
always 묠 15-346-2
always 묡 15-346-2-1
always 묢 15-346-2-26
always 묣 15-346-2-12
always 묤 15-346-2-3
always 묥 15-346-2-236
always 묦 15-346-2-256
always 묧 15-346-2-356
always 묨 15-346-26
always 묩 15-346-12
always 묪 15-346-12-3
always 묫 15-346-3
always 묬 15-346-3-3
always 묭 15-346-2356
always 묮 15-346-13
always 묯 15-346-23
always 묰 15-346-235
always 묱 15-346-236
always 묲 15-346-256
always 묳 15-346-356
always 무 15-134
always 묵 15-134-1
always 묶 15-134-1-1
always 묷 15-134-1-3
always 문 15-134-25
always 묹 15-134-25-13
always 묺 15-134-25-356
always 묻 15-134-35
always 물 15-134-2
always 묽 15-134-2-1
always 묾 15-134-2-26
always 묿 15-134-2-12
always 뭀 15-134-2-3
always 뭁 15-134-2-236
always 뭂 15-134-2-256
always 뭃 15-134-2-356
always 뭄 15-134-26
always 뭅 15-134-12
always 뭆 15-134-12-3
always 뭇 15-134-3
always 뭈 15-134-3-3
always 뭉 15-134-2356
always 뭊 15-134-13
always 뭋 15-134-23
always 뭌 15-134-235
always 뭍 15-134-236
always 뭎 15-134-256
always 뭏 15-134-356
always 뭐 15-1234
always 뭑 15-1234-1
always 뭒 15-1234-1-1
always 뭓 15-1234-1-3
always 뭔 15-1234-25
always 뭕 15-1234-25-13
always 뭖 15-1234-25-356
always 뭗 15-1234-35
always 뭘 15-1234-2
always 뭙 15-1234-2-1
always 뭚 15-1234-2-26
always 뭛 15-1234-2-12
always 뭜 15-1234-2-3
always 뭝 15-1234-2-236
always 뭞 15-1234-2-256
always 뭟 15-1234-2-356
always 뭠 15-1234-26
always 뭡 15-1234-12
always 뭢 15-1234-12-3
always 뭣 15-1234-3
always 뭤 15-1234-3-3
always 뭥 15-1234-2356
always 뭦 15-1234-13
always 뭧 15-1234-23
always 뭨 15-1234-235
always 뭩 15-1234-236
always 뭪 15-1234-256
always 뭫 15-1234-356
always 뭬 15-1234-1235
always 뭭 15-1234-1235-1
always 뭮 15-1234-1235-1-1
always 뭯 15-1234-1235-1-3
always 뭰 15-1234-1235-25
always 뭱 15-1234-1235-25-13
always 뭲 15-1234-1235-25-356
always 뭳 15-1234-1235-35
always 뭴 15-1234-1235-2
always 뭵 15-1234-1235-2-1
always 뭶 15-1234-1235-2-26
always 뭷 15-1234-1235-2-12
always 뭸 15-1234-1235-2-3
always 뭹 15-1234-1235-2-236
always 뭺 15-1234-1235-2-256
always 뭻 15-1234-1235-2-356
always 뭼 15-1234-1235-26
always 뭽 15-1234-1235-12
always 뭾 15-1234-1235-12-3
always 뭿 15-1234-1235-3
always 뮀 15-1234-1235-3-3
always 뮁 15-1234-1235-2356
always 뮂 15-1234-1235-13
always 뮃 15-1234-1235-23
always 뮄 15-1234-1235-235
always 뮅 15-1234-1235-236
always 뮆 15-1234-1235-256
always 뮇 15-1234-1235-356
always 뮈 15-134-1235
always 뮉 15-134-1235-1
always 뮊 15-134-1235-1-1
always 뮋 15-134-1235-1-3
always 뮌 15-134-1235-25
always 뮍 15-134-1235-25-13
always 뮎 15-134-1235-25-356
always 뮏 15-134-1235-35
always 뮐 15-134-1235-2
always 뮑 15-134-1235-2-1
always 뮒 15-134-1235-2-26
always 뮓 15-134-1235-2-12
always 뮔 15-134-1235-2-3
always 뮕 15-134-1235-2-236
always 뮖 15-134-1235-2-256
always 뮗 15-134-1235-2-356
always 뮘 15-134-1235-26
always 뮙 15-134-1235-12
always 뮚 15-134-1235-12-3
always 뮛 15-134-1235-3
always 뮜 15-134-1235-3-3
always 뮝 15-134-1235-2356
always 뮞 15-134-1235-13
always 뮟 15-134-1235-23
always 뮠 15-134-1235-235
always 뮡 15-134-1235-236
always 뮢 15-134-1235-256
always 뮣 15-134-1235-356
always 뮤 15-146
always 뮥 15-146-1
always 뮦 15-146-1-1
always 뮧 15-146-1-3
always 뮨 15-146-25
always 뮩 15-146-25-13
always 뮪 15-146-25-356
always 뮫 15-146-35
always 뮬 15-146-2
always 뮭 15-146-2-1
always 뮮 15-146-2-26
always 뮯 15-146-2-12
always 뮰 15-146-2-3
always 뮱 15-146-2-236
always 뮲 15-146-2-256
always 뮳 15-146-2-356
always 뮴 15-146-26
always 뮵 15-146-12
always 뮶 15-146-12-3
always 뮷 15-146-3
always 뮸 15-146-3-3
always 뮹 15-146-2356
always 뮺 15-146-13
always 뮻 15-146-23
always 뮼 15-146-235
always 뮽 15-146-236
always 뮾 15-146-256
always 뮿 15-146-356
always 므 15-246
always 믁 15-246-1
always 믂 15-246-1-1
always 믃 15-246-1-3
always 믄 15-246-25
always 믅 15-246-25-13
always 믆 15-246-25-356
always 믇 15-246-35
always 믈 15-246-2
always 믉 15-246-2-1
always 믊 15-246-2-26
always 믋 15-246-2-12
always 믌 15-246-2-3
always 믍 15-246-2-236
always 믎 15-246-2-256
always 믏 15-246-2-356
always 믐 15-246-26
always 믑 15-246-12
always 믒 15-246-12-3
always 믓 15-246-3
always 믔 15-246-3-3
always 믕 15-246-2356
always 믖 15-246-13
always 믗 15-246-23
always 믘 15-246-235
always 믙 15-246-236
always 믚 15-246-256
always 믛 15-246-356
always 믜 15-2456
always 믝 15-2456-1
always 믞 15-2456-1-1
always 믟 15-2456-1-3
always 믠 15-2456-25
always 믡 15-2456-25-13
always 믢 15-2456-25-356
always 믣 15-2456-35
always 믤 15-2456-2
always 믥 15-2456-2-1
always 믦 15-2456-2-26
always 믧 15-2456-2-12
always 믨 15-2456-2-3
always 믩 15-2456-2-236
always 믪 15-2456-2-256
always 믫 15-2456-2-356
always 믬 15-2456-26
always 믭 15-2456-12
always 믮 15-2456-12-3
always 믯 15-2456-3
always 믰 15-2456-3-3
always 믱 15-2456-2356
always 믲 15-2456-13
always 믳 15-2456-23
always 믴 15-2456-235
always 믵 15-2456-236
always 믶 15-2456-256
always 믷 15-2456-356
always 미 15-135
always 믹 15-135-1
always 믺 15-135-1-1
always 믻 15-135-1-3
always 민 15-135-25
always 믽 15-135-25-13
always 믾 15-135-25-356
always 믿 15-135-35
always 밀 15-135-2
always 밁 15-135-2-1
always 밂 15-135-2-26
always 밃 15-135-2-12
always 밄 15-135-2-3
always 밅 15-135-2-236
always 밆 15-135-2-256
always 밇 15-135-2-356
always 밈 15-135-26
always 밉 15-135-12
always 밊 15-135-12-3
always 밋 15-135-3
always 밌 15-135-3-3
always 밍 15-135-2356
always 밎 15-135-13
always 및 15-135-23
always 밐 15-135-235
always 밑 15-135-236
always 밒 15-135-256
always 밓 15-135-356
always 바 45-126
always 박 45-126-1
always 밖 45-126-1-1
always 밗 45-126-1-3
always 반 45-126-25
always 밙 45-126-25-13
always 밚 45-126-25-356
always 받 45-126-35
always 발 45-126-2
always 밝 45-126-2-1
always 밞 45-126-2-26
always 밟 45-126-2-12
always 밠 45-126-2-3
always 밡 45-126-2-236
always 밢 45-126-2-256
always 밣 45-126-2-356
always 밤 45-126-26
always 밥 45-126-12
always 밦 45-126-12-3
always 밧 45-126-3
always 밨 45-126-3-3
always 방 45-126-2356
always 밪 45-126-13
always 밫 45-126-23
always 밬 45-126-235
always 밭 45-126-236
always 밮 45-126-256
always 밯 45-126-356
always 배 45-1235
always 백 45-1235-1
always 밲 45-1235-1-1
always 밳 45-1235-1-3
always 밴 45-1235-25
always 밵 45-1235-25-13
always 밶 45-1235-25-356
always 밷 45-1235-35
always 밸 45-1235-2
always 밹 45-1235-2-1
always 밺 45-1235-2-26
always 밻 45-1235-2-12
always 밼 45-1235-2-3
always 밽 45-1235-2-236
always 밾 45-1235-2-256
always 밿 45-1235-2-356
always 뱀 45-1235-26
always 뱁 45-1235-12
always 뱂 45-1235-12-3
always 뱃 45-1235-3
always 뱄 45-1235-3-3
always 뱅 45-1235-2356
always 뱆 45-1235-13
always 뱇 45-1235-23
always 뱈 45-1235-235
always 뱉 45-1235-236
always 뱊 45-1235-256
always 뱋 45-1235-356
always 뱌 45-345
always 뱍 45-345-1
always 뱎 45-345-1-1
always 뱏 45-345-1-3
always 뱐 45-345-25
always 뱑 45-345-25-13
always 뱒 45-345-25-356
always 뱓 45-345-35
always 뱔 45-345-2
always 뱕 45-345-2-1
always 뱖 45-345-2-26
always 뱗 45-345-2-12
always 뱘 45-345-2-3
always 뱙 45-345-2-236
always 뱚 45-345-2-256
always 뱛 45-345-2-356
always 뱜 45-345-26
always 뱝 45-345-12
always 뱞 45-345-12-3
always 뱟 45-345-3
always 뱠 45-345-3-3
always 뱡 45-345-2356
always 뱢 45-345-13
always 뱣 45-345-23
always 뱤 45-345-235
always 뱥 45-345-236
always 뱦 45-345-256
always 뱧 45-345-356
always 뱨 45-345-1235
always 뱩 45-345-1235-1
always 뱪 45-345-1235-1-1
always 뱫 45-345-1235-1-3
always 뱬 45-345-1235-25
always 뱭 45-345-1235-25-13
always 뱮 45-345-1235-25-356
always 뱯 45-345-1235-35
always 뱰 45-345-1235-2
always 뱱 45-345-1235-2-1
always 뱲 45-345-1235-2-26
always 뱳 45-345-1235-2-12
